South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4813.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Magistrates court fees and costs SECTION 1.A.    Section 8-21-1010 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 8-21-1010.    (A) Except as otherwise expressly provided, the following fees and costs must be collected by the magistrates and deposited in the general fund of the county: (1) for taking civil recognizance, with or without sureties, five dollars; (2) for granting an order for civil special bail, with or without sureties, five dollars; (3) for receiving and filing bond in claim and delivery, attachment, ten dollars; if justification of sureties required, an additional five dollars; (4) for administering and certifying oaths or documents in writing, two dollars; (5) for issuing any prerogative writ, five dollars; (6) in all civil actions, for issuing a summons and a copy for defendant, and for giving judgment with or without a hearing, sixty-five dollars; (7) for issuing execution and renewal thereof, twenty dollars; (8) for making up, certifying, and forwarding a transcript of record and judgment in a case for purpose of appeal, ten dollars; (9) for proceedings by a landlord or lessor against a tenant or lessee, including notices to quit, eviction orders, or recovery of rents, forty dollars; (10) for proceedings on a coroner's inquest, as prescribed by law, ten dollars, if inquest is demanded by a party other than the State or county or authorized officer of either; (11) for proceedings on estrays, including judgment for possession, sale, or damages, ten dollars; (12) for qualifying appraisers to set off homestead or qualifying sureties on a bond posted in a case, including bail bonds, five dollars; (13) for each tax execution collected, five dollars; and (14) for filing or issuing any other paper not provided for in this section, ten dollars. (B) Fees or costs may not be assessed against a party for summoning jurors or expense of jury service in a criminal case in which a trial by jury is had. (C) Any increase in fees and costs under subsection (A) which takes effect January 1, 2027, must be used to supplement, and not supplant, existing funds utilized to provide sufficient facilities, personnel, and security for the necessary and proper operation of the magistrates courts in each county. B.    Section 8-21-1060 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 8-21-1060.    (A) Except as otherwise expressly provided, the following fees and costs must be collected by the magistrate or his officers and deposited in the general fund of the county: (1) for summoning a witness to magistrate court in a civil action, three dollars, plus mileage at the current state rate; (2) for summoning the jury panel to try a civil action in magistrate court, five dollars, to be taxed against the losing party; (3) for summoning a coroner's jury and witnesses, five dollars, and mileage, to be paid only if inquest is demanded by person other than the State, county, or authorized officer thereof; (4) for serving a summons, rule, order, or notice by a magistrate in a civil action, twenty dollars; (5) for serving an attachment or civil arrest on a person and making return thereof, five dollars, plus mileage; (6) for selling an estray, five percent of the sale proceeds; (7) for levying execution, posting notice of sale, conducting sale, and paying over proceeds in a magistrate court action, twenty dollars; (8) for serving warrants, or any other criminal process, and for conveying prisoners by order of the magistrate or other court, mileage as permitted under Section 8-21-1040. (B) Any increase in fees and costs under subsection (A) which takes effect January 1, 2027, must be used to supplement, and not supplant, existing funds utilized to provide sufficient facilities and personnel for the necessary and proper operation of the magistrates courts in each county. Filing assessments SECTION 2.    Section 22-3-340 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 22-3-340.    An assessment equal to forty dollars is imposed on all summons and complaint filings in magistrates court and an assessment equal to fifteen dollars is imposed on all other civil filings in magistrates court, except for restraining orders. The fees must be collected by the magistrates court and forwarded monthly to the county treasurer and remitted in turn by the county treasurer to the State Treasurer for allocation to the judicial department. Eligibility examinations SECTION 3.    Section 22-2-5(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) The South Carolina Court Administration, in cooperation with the technical college system, shall select and administer an eligibility examination to test basic skills of persons seeking an initial appointment as magistrate on or after July 1, 2001. In determining the persons to be recommended to the Governor for initial appointments as magistrates on or after July 1, 2001, a senatorial delegation must use the results of these eligibility examinations to assist in its selection of nominees. No person is eligible to be appointed as a magistrate unless he receives a passing score on the eligibility examination. The results of these eligibility examinations are valid for eighteen months before and eighteen months after the time the appointment is to be made. Time effective SECTION 4.    This act takes effect on January 1, 2027. Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. Approved the 15th day of May, 2026. __________